Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-220
Mayor; executive, administrative powers; absence from city; notice.

The mayor of a city of the metropolitan class shall have the superintending control of all officers and affairs of the city except when otherwise provided by law. The mayor may, when deemed necessary, require any officer of the city to exhibit such officer's accounts or any other papers and to make report to the city council, in writing, touching any subject or matter the mayor may require pertaining to such office. The mayor shall, from time to time, communicate to the city council such information and recommend such measures as, in the mayor's opinion, may tend to the improvement of the finances, police, health, security, ornament, comfort, and general prosperity of the city. The mayor shall be active and vigilant in enforcing all laws and ordinances of the city and shall cause all subordinate officers to be dealt with promptly in any neglect or violation of duty. The mayor shall give written notice to the city clerk of the mayor's intended absence from the city.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 19, p. 430;

C.S.1922, § 3545;

C.S.1929, § 14-220;

R.S.1943, § 14-220;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 52.
July 21, 2022
It is duty of mayor and chief of police to interfere for the prevention of public violation of law, such as pool room used for gambling. Moores v. State ex rel. Dunn, 71 Neb. 522, 99 N.W. 249 (1904).